California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(i) The number of persons over the age of 65 years receiving aid under the State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled, provided for under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(ii) The number of persons over the age of 75 years.

(iii) The number of minority elderly over the age of 60 years.

(iv) The number of persons over the age of 60 years living alone.

(v) The number of non-English-speaking persons over the age of 60 years.

(B) The weight given to each variable shall simulate the weighting used in the Washington State intrastate funding formula adjusting for the geographic factor.

(3) A rural factor that guarantees a 105 percent allocation to rural planning and service areas.

(4) A hold-harmless factor that guarantees that no planning and service area shall have its federal and state allocation of funds under Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021, et seq.), excluding area agency on aging administrative costs and funds carried over from the 1983–84 fiscal year, reduced below the 1984–85 fiscal year funding levels.

(c) In the event that additional federal or state funds, in excess of those appropriated under the 1984–85 Budget Act, or subsequent Budget Acts are made available for services, these funds shall be used to maintain existing service levels, with the remainder to be distributed to those planning and service areas which have been determined by the department to be under equity until parity is achieved.

(d) The department shall develop, in conjunction with the intrastate funding formula, a methodology for assuring compliance with the state targeting strategy on an intraplanning and service area basis. In developing this methodology the department shall provide assurances that as additional federal and state service dollars are allocated to the planning and service areas these dollars will be expended on those elderly individuals identified as in greatest economic or social need.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9114.

The department may, where necessary to ensure the continued provision of services or program operation, advance available state funds to an area agency on aging in an amount up to one-sixth of the annual state and federal allocation to the area agency on aging.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Senior Housing Information and Support Center [9115. - 9117.]

9115.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) According to a 2015 analysis of federal and state poverty data under the Supplemental Poverty Measure, 45 percent of adults over 65 years of age have incomes below 200 percent of the 2013 poverty threshold.

(b) Over one-third of households with an older adult face a high housing cost burden.

(c) As of 2016, 50 percent of homeless adults are over 50 years of age.

(d) Forty-four percent of all homeless older adults became homeless after 50 years of age.

(e) Older adults face special challenges when faced with housing insecurity, such as accessibility needs, physical limitations, cognitive limitations, and difficulty accessing benefits.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 13.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9116.

The Director of the California Department of Aging shall appoint all necessary staff to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9117.

Implementation of this article shall be subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 797, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Engaging Elders Through Volunteerism [9118. - 9118.]

9118.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The talents of our older adults will prove to be vital to the prosperity and well-being of California.

(b) California’s older adults possess experience and perspective that can be expanded through strong organizational associations.

(c) California’s older adults represent enormous civic potential, and they are underutilized.

(d) California’s older adults should be provided opportunities for civic involvement.

(e) The AARP reports that two-thirds of its
 senior corps volunteers reported a decrease in isolation upon volunteering.

(f) Sixty-seven percent of older adults who volunteer report that their social connectedness has increased because of the volunteer work.

(g) Volunteering has been shown to reduce self-reported symptoms of depression in older adults.

(h) Volunteer organizations maintain support for older adults and leverage individual interests and abilities through established community involvement

(i) Volunteering or donating time to nonprofit organizations may be an ideal low-cost strategy to help improve health among older adults.

(j) Volunteer roles that accommodate the variability of individual capabilities are likely to
 attract older volunteers who commit more and largely benefit from their experience.

(k) California’s older adults should be provided an array of volunteer opportunities to ensure the choice and flexibility of engagement.

(l) Extended periods of productivity in older adults contributes to improved health conditions and emotional well-being.

(m) Volunteer organizations are an investment in human capital and support the advancement of California’s older adults and community at large.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 337, Sec. 15.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Aging and Disability Resource Connection Program [9120. - 9123.]

9120.

(a) There is hereby established an Aging and Disability Resource Connection (ADRC) program to provide information to consumers and their families on available long-term services and supports (LTSS) programs and to assist older adults, caregivers, and persons with disabilities in accessing LTSS programs at the local level through ADRC programs operated jointly by area agencies on aging and independent living centers.

(b) This article shall be administered and implemented by the California Department of Aging, in collaboration with the Department of Rehabilitation and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) Area
 agencies on aging and independent living centers shall be the core local partners in developing ADRC programs. The California Department of Aging shall assist interested and qualified area agencies on aging and independent living centers in completing an application to be designated as an ADRC program.

(d) An ADRC program operated by an area agency on aging and an independent living center shall provide all of the following:

(1) Enhanced information and referral services and other assistance at hours that are convenient for the public.

(2) Options counseling concerning available LTSS programs and public and private benefits programs.

(3) Short-term service
 coordination.

(4) Transition services from hospitals to home and from skilled nursing facilities to the community.

(e) An ADRC program operated by an area agency on aging and an independent living center shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide services within the geographic area served.

(2) Provide information to the public about the services provided by the program.

(f) (1) The California Department of Aging, in consultation with the Aging and Disability Resource Connection Advisory Committee within the California Department of Aging, shall develop a core model of ADRC best practices. These best practices shall be implemented by July 1, 2022, by all ADRC programs operated by area agencies on aging and independent living centers. To the extent feasible, the best practices shall be considered in the development and continued updating of the master plan on aging. In the development of these best practices, the department and advisory committee shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following practices:

(A) A person-centered counseling process.

(B) Public outreach and coordination with key referral sources, including, but not limited to, caregiver resource centers, the medical centers of the United States Department of Veteran Affairs, acute care systems, local 211 programs, local multipurpose senior service programs, Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE), adult day care services, and LTSS providers.

(C) A formal followup procedure to ensure that services for which a person received a referral were received and methods for correcting service provision if needed.

(D) A model for the best ways for area agencies on aging and independent living centers to share necessary data and client information.

(E) A model for the collection and reporting of data to the California Department of Aging, which shall include, but not be limited to, the demographic information for each individual counseled, the number of consumers served by category of service, and the number of caregivers served.

(2) The California Department of Aging shall review implementation of the ADRC Infrastructure Grants Program described in Section 9121 for consideration in developing and updating the best practices model.

(g) The implementation of this section is contingent on an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, or another act, for that express purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (SB 453)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9120.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Department of Aging shall not revoke the designation of an ADRC program solely due to the revocation or voluntary termination of a designation, suspension, or temporary inability of either the area agency on aging or the independent living center partner to serve in its operator role. In those circumstances, either the area agency on aging or the independent living center may opt to continue to operate the ADRC program independently during a transition period of up to two years, as jointly determined by the California Department of Aging and the Department of Rehabilitation, with advice from the Aging and Disability Resource Connection Advisory Committee, when practicable, while a new or replacement partner is identified and
 designated. 

(2) At the conclusion of the ADRC extension term identified in paragraph (1), the ADRC program shall be dissolved, unless both the area agency on aging and independent living center jointly agree to continue the ADRC program. 

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the California Department of Aging may extend the terms of an ADRC contract beyond the extension specified in paragraph (1) if two or more qualified entities are in the process of consolidation. 

(b) During the transition period described in subdivision (a), the services provided by the ADRC shall continue without interruption, and joint operation shall be reestablished upon designation of the replacement partner that serves older adults or is a peer-led disability
 organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (SB 1261)   Effective September 20, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9121.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, the California Department of Aging shall administer the Aging and Disability Resource Connection (ADRC) Infrastructure Grants Program for the purpose of implementing a No Wrong Door System. Funds shall be awarded pursuant to the grant program to interested and qualified area agencies on aging and independent living centers, including area agencies on aging and independent living centers in rural areas, to complete the planning and application process for designation and approval to operate as an ADRC program pursuant to Section 9120. Grant funds may also be awarded to aid designated ADRC programs operated by area agencies on aging and independent living centers in expanding or strengthening the services they provide.

(b) For purposes of this article, “No Wrong Door System” means a system that enables consumers to access all long-term services and supports (LTSS) through one agency, organization, coordinated network, or portal, and that provides information regarding the availability of LTSS, how to apply for LTSS, referral services for LTSS otherwise available in the community, and either a determination of financial and functional eligibility for LTSS or assistance with assessment processes for financial and functional eligibility for LTSS.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 20.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9122.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the No Wrong Door System described in Section 9121 serve seniors and individuals with disabilities by doing all of the following:

(1) Providing consumers and their caregivers access to information and services, regardless of income or benefit level.

(2) Enabling an Aging and Disability Resource Connection (ADRC) program to directly connect a client to appropriate local programs.

(3) Providing each consumer in California with access to individualized support and community resources to meet their needs
 and to enable them to continue living in their own homes, if desired.

(b) The Aging and Disability Resource Connection Advisory Committee, which has been established within the California Department of Aging, shall serve as the primary adviser to the California Department of Aging, the Department of Rehabilitation, and the State Department of Health Care Services in the ongoing development and implementation of the No Wrong Door System described in Section 9121. The advisory committee may utilize staff of the California Department of Aging, as needed, to accomplish its purposes. The California Department of Aging shall expand the membership of the advisory committee as necessary to include the perspective of all relevant stakeholders.

(c) The Aging and Disability Resource Connection
 Advisory Committee shall, upon the request of the California Department of Aging, or any task force appointed thereunder for the purpose of developing and updating a master plan on aging, consult with and offer input regarding the development and updating of that master plan.

(d) The California Department of Aging, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop a plan for, and oversee the phased statewide implementation of, the No Wrong Door System that utilizes the ADRC program to assist older adults and people with disabilities to obtain accurate information and timely referrals to appropriate community services and supports. The plan shall include near- and long-term tactics for statewide implementation.

(2) Serve as a statewide facilitator, coordinator, and policy development resource on the ADRC program and No Wrong Door System.

(3) Identify mainstream resources, benefits, and services that can be accessed for the No Wrong Door System.

(4) Create partnerships among state agencies and departments, local government agencies, the federal Administration for Community Living, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and the federal Veterans Health Administration.

(5) Coordinate existing funding and applications for competitive funding, while also exploring avenues for future funding, including, but not limited to, Medicaid and federal Veterans
 Health Administration funding.

(6) Make policy and procedural recommendations to the Legislature and other governmental entities.

(7) Consider the expansion of the “no wrong door” approach to programs and policies outside of the California Health and Human Services Agency.

(8) (A) Report to the Governor and the Legislature on the No Wrong Door System and the implementation of the system.

(B) Reports to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) The implementation of this section is contingent on an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, or another act, for that express purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 850, Sec. 3.   (SB 453)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9123.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the California Department of Aging, shall determine if the Medicaid administrative claiming process may be used to fund the No Wrong Door System, or activities associated with the No Wrong Door System, including, but not limited to, outreach,
 person-centered counseling, training, program planning, and quality improvement.

(b) If the State Department of Health Care
 Services identifies activities for which the Medicaid administrative claiming process is available, the State Department of Health Care Services may take necessary action to receive the funding to the extent possible.

(c) The implementation of this section is contingent on an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, or another act, for that express purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 850, Sec. 4.   (SB 453)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Comprehensive Act for Families and Caregivers of Cognitively Impaired Adults [9156. - 9163.]

9156.

The Legislature finds all of the following:

(a) Across California, approximately 4,500,000 family caregivers support adult loved ones who seek to remain at home and avoid institutionalization. Of these, more than 1,100,000 family caregivers are caring for someone with Alzheimer’s disease or related dementia, usually with little support or training.

(b) Caring for a loved one with a cognitive disorder or another disabling condition can be very challenging, causing financial pressure, health problems, and emotional distress.

(c) The California Caregiver Resource Centers (CRCs) provide services to family caregivers of adults affected by
 chronic and debilitating health conditions, including dementia, Alzheimer’s disease, cerebrovascular diseases, degenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s disease, Huntington’s disease and multiple sclerosis, or traumatic brain injury, among others.

(d) California’s CRC system supports caregivers in their critical and increasingly complex roles through assessment, care planning, direct care skills, wellness programs, respite services, and legal or financial consultation. These supports are important in helping caregivers navigate the complex health and social needs of loved ones.

(e) The CRC network is vital to supporting California’s 4,500,000 diverse caregivers, which will only continue to grow as the state’s population ages.

(f) The state shall support family caregivers by funding and implementing the California
 CRCs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9157.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Caregiver” means any unpaid family member or individual who assumes responsibility for the care of a cognitively impaired adult with chronic and debilitating health conditions, including dementia, Alzheimer’s disease, cerebrovascular diseases such as stroke or aneurysm, degenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s disease, Huntington’s disease, and multiple sclerosis, or traumatic brain injury.

(b) “Cognitive impairment” means significant destruction of brain tissue with resultant loss of brain function. Examples of causes of the impairments include dementia, Alzheimer’s disease, cerebrovascular
 diseases such as stroke or aneurysm, degenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s disease, Huntington’s disease, and multiple sclerosis, or traumatic brain injury.

(c) “Cognitively impaired adult” means a person whose cognitive impairment has occurred on or after 18 years of age.

(d) “CRC” means a caregiver resource center.

(e) “Department” means the California Department of Aging.

(f) “Family member” means any relative, partner, or court-appointed guardian or conservator who is responsible for the care of a cognitively impaired adult.

(g) “Respite care” means substitute care or supervision in support of the caregiver for the purposes of providing relief from the stresses of providing constant care and so as to enable the caregiver to pursue a normal routine and responsibilities. Respite care may be provided in the home or in an out-of-home setting, such as adult daycare centers or short-term placements in licensed residential care, skilled nursing, or inpatient facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9158.

The department shall administer this chapter and establish standards and procedures as the director deems necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The standards and procedures are not required to be adopted as regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9159.

(a) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Maintain or enter into contracts directly with nonprofit CRCs to provide direct services to caregivers throughout the state in the existing geographic service areas.

(2) Require the CRCs to maintain a CRC Operations Manual that defines CRC services and procedures and identifies CRC duties and responsibilities.

(b) The department may
 enter into any contracts under this chapter on a bid or noncompetitive bid basis. These contracts shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9160.

(a) Agencies designated as CRCs by the department shall include in their governing or advisory boards, or both, as required by the department, persons who are representative of the ethnic and socioeconomic demographic of the area served and reflective of the client groups served in the geographic area.

(b) Criteria to be used in selecting CRCs shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Fiscal stability and sound financial management, including the capability of successful fundraising.

(2) Ability to obtain community support for designation as a CRC within the existing statewide regions recommended by the department.

(3) Ability to carry out the functions specified in Section 9161, particularly in delivering necessary programs and services to caregivers taking care of cognitively impaired adults, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 9157.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9161.

(a) The CRCs shall deliver services to and advocate for caregivers of cognitively impaired adults, as established in the CRC Operations Manual.

(b) These services shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Specialized and accessible information on chronic and disabling conditions and diseases, aging, caregiving issues, and community resources.

(2) Family consultation. Professional staff shall work with families and caregivers to provide
 support, alleviate stress, examine options, and enable them to make decisions related to the care of cognitively impaired adults. Clinical staff shall provide an assessment of caregiver needs, short- and long-term care planning, and ongoing consultation.

(3) Respite care. The CRCs shall arrange respite services to relieve caregivers of the stress of constant care.

(4) Short-term counseling. The CRCs shall provide short-term individual or group counseling sessions to caregivers seeking emotional support, skill development, and strategies to better cope with their caregiving situation.

(5) Support groups. The CRCs shall offer support groups that enable caregivers to share experiences and ideas to ease the stress of their caregiving role.

(6) Legal and financial consultation, including professional legal assistance or referrals to professional legal assistance, that can help caregivers with a variety of issues, including estate planning, trusts, wills, conservatorships, and durable powers of attorney.

(7) Education and training. The CRCs shall organize and conduct education for groups of caregivers and community professionals on a variety of topics related to caregiving.

(c) The amount of each of the services specified in subdivision (b) that are provided shall be determined by local needs and available resources.

(d) Persons receiving services pursuant to this chapter may be required to contribute to the cost of services depending upon their ability to pay, but not to exceed the actual cost thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9162.

Each CRC shall submit progress reports on its activities as required by the department. These reports shall include, but not be limited to, a summary and evaluation of the activities of the CRC. Client, caregiver, service, and cost data shall be provided for each operating CRC.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9163.

The department shall administer the statewide caregiver resource center program as a distinct state-level program separate from Title III of the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3021 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 39.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Support for Older and Aging Immigrants Regardless of Immigration Status [9170. - 9175.]

9170.

(a) The department shall oversee a stakeholder process to support the development of findings and recommendations on how to best support older and aging immigrants in California, regardless of their immigration status. To help inform the stakeholder process, the department
 shall establish a panel. The director may, if appropriate, modify an existing panel for purposes of this article, subject to the requirements described in Section 9171.

(b) The department may contract with academic research entities to commission expert research and testimony to supplement the stakeholder process and support the development of findings and recommendations required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 9175.)
-------------------------------------------

9171.

(a) The panel established pursuant to Section 9170 shall invite stakeholders and subject matter experts, including representatives from the State Department of Social Services, clinics, researchers, housing advocates, trusted community partners, and nonprofit organizations to participate in the stakeholder process. As appropriate, the costs of the panel and the stakeholder process may be reduced by in-kind or other contributions from third parties.

(b) During the stakeholder
 process, the department and members of the panel shall consider issues including, but not limited to, affordability and guaranteed basic income, access to social services and housing, and access to health care services, including specialty care and language access.

(c) The first meeting of the panel shall be held no later than 120 days after funding becomes available for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 9175.)
-------------------------------------------

9172.

(a) Upon completion of the stakeholder process required by this article, but by no later than July 1, 2028, the panel shall issue findings and recommendations to the department and the State Department of Social Services on the most effective ways to implement policies and programs to support older and aging immigrants in California, regardless of their immigration status.

(b) On or before December 31, 2028, the department and the State Department of Social Services shall jointly present a report including the findings and recommendations provided by the panel under subdivision (a) to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 9175.)
-------------------------------------------

9173.

For purposes of this article, “older and aging” means an adult 60 years of age or older.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 9175.)
-------------------------------------------

9174.

This article shall be implemented upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 9175.)
-------------------------------------------

9175.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 364, Sec. 2.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.     Note: Repeal affects Article 6, commencing with Section 9170.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. California Commission on Aging [9200. - 9205.]

9200.

(a) (1) There is in the state government the California Commission on Aging.

(2) The commission shall be composed of 18 persons, as follows:

(A) Twelve persons shall be appointed by the Governor.
 At least 2 of the 12 persons shall be appointed by the Governor from nominees submitted by, among others, area agency on aging directors and the Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California, also known as the Triple-A Council of California.

(B) Three persons appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(C) Three persons appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.

(3) The commission
 shall be comprised of a majority of members 60 years of age or older.

(4) The commission shall be comprised of actual consumers and providers of services under the federal Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3001, et seq.), as amended, with professional, lived, or academic expertise both within and outside of the field of aging, including, but not limited to, health, behavioral health, Alzheimer’s and related dementias, long-term services and supports, long-term care, housing, transportation, independent living, workforce development, caregiving, elder justice, information technology, and economic security, among others.

(5) The commission shall be composed of representatives of the geographic, cultural, economic, and other social factors in the state.

(b) The commission composition requirements shall be complied with as vacancies occur.

(c) For the purposes of conducting meetings pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the commission is an “advisory commission” within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 11123.5 of the Government Code and, therefore, subject to Section 11123.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (AB 2620)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9201.

The term of office of members of the commission shall be three years. Members shall not serve more than two full terms and shall be appointed for staggered terms. The members shall select one of their members to serve as chairperson and one of their members to serve as vice chairperson on an annual basis.

A commissioner who fails to attend two consecutive monthly meetings or who fails to attend four meetings per year, without having given written excuse acceptable to the commission, shall cause the commission to notify the appointing authority, and the appointing authority
 may declare the position vacant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (AB 2620)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

The duties and functions of the commission shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Serve as the principal advocate body in the state on behalf of older individuals, including, but not limited to, advisory participation in the consideration of all legislation, regulations, and initiatives made by state and
 federal departments and agencies relating to programs and services that affect older adults, adults with disabilities, and caregivers.

(b) Participate with the department in training workshops for community, regional and statewide aging and disability advocates, to promote greater understanding of the legislative, regulatory,
 and program implementation processes.

(c) Prepare, publish, and disseminate information, findings, and recommendations regarding the health and well-being of older individuals.

(d) Actively participate and advise the department in the development and preparation of the State Plan on Aging, conduct public hearings on the State Plan on Aging, review and comment on the state plan, and monitor the progress of the plan’s implementation.

(e) Meet at least four times annually in order to study problems of older individuals
 and present findings and make recommendations.

(f) Hold hearings throughout the state, that may include conducting an annual statewide hearing inviting all departments administering programs affecting
 older adults, adults with disabilities, and caregivers, in order to gather information and advise the Governor, Legislature, department, and agencies on all levels of government regarding solutions to problems confronting older individuals and the most effective use of existing resources and available services for individuals.

(g) Hire an executive director, who will, within budgetary limits, hire staff as may be necessary for the commission to fulfill its duties.

(h) Perform other duties as may be required by statute, regulation, resolution, or executive order.

(i) Meet and consult with the
 Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California in order to exchange information, and assist in training, planning, and development of advocacy skills.

(j) Monitor and, when deemed appropriate, engage in federal advocacy efforts that may include, but not be limited to, providing comments on federal Older Americans Act reauthorizations and federal rulemaking packages impacting older adults, adults with disabilities, and caregivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   (AB 2620)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

The commission may accept gifts and grants from any source, public or private, to assist it in the performance of its functions, and the gifts and grants shall operate to augment any appropriation made for the support of the commission, provided that the department shall serve as the fiscal agent for the accounting of the gifts and grants and that no gifts or grants shall be used for the operation by the commission of direct service programs that would conflict with the department’s duties and functions as described by law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.5.

The commission may also accept gifts on behalf of the Area Agency on Aging Advisory Council of California, subject to the provisions of Section 9203, as those provisions apply to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 633, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2006, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 9 of Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

Wherever there is a reference in any statute of this state to the Citizens Advisory Committee on Aging of the California Commission on Aging, it shall be construed to refer to the California Commission on Aging if the reference concerns an advisory or advocacy function, or a function described in Section 9202. Any other reference shall be construed to refer to the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Coordinated System of Care [9250. - 9256.]

9250.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Our delivery of long-term care needs to be vastly improved in order to coordinate services that are appropriate to each individual’s functional needs and financial situation. Care services should be holistic and address the needs of the entire person, including the person’s mental, physical, social, and emotional needs.

(2) The coming age wave will bankrupt California if we maintain the current uncoordinated system of long-term care.

(3) The new generation of aging Californians will desire, expect, and demand a much more responsive, coherent, and human-dignified system of care services.

(4) Multiple funding streams and varied eligibility criteria have created “silos” of services, making it difficult for consumers to move with ease from one service or program to another.

(5) Separate funding streams and uncoordinated services for older adults and adults with disabilities have created barriers in services for these populations. Adults with disabilities often receive long-term care services designed to support and protect the institutionalized older population. Instead, services need to be individualized to empower older adults and persons with disabilities to live in the community.

(6) Historically, two delivery systems, referred to as the medical model and the social model of care, have evolved with little or no coordination between the two.

(7) A high percentage of consumers enter the long-term care system after a hospitalization. Assistance and support following hospitalization would reduce the number of nursing home placements.

(8) The Legislature affirms the notion that individuals should be able to receive care in the least restrictive environment.

(9) Skilled nursing facilities account for 5 percent of the long-term care caseload and 52 percent of the long-term care expenditures. Home and community-based services account for 78 percent of the long-term care caseload, and 13 percent of long-term care expenditures. It is, therefore, more cost-effective to connect consumers with services in the community than to continue to place individuals in institutions.

(10) A number of counties and programs have developed and implemented innovative Internet-based information systems. Some of these systems are designed to help consumers access information regarding long-term care services, and others are designed to help providers track client information.
